miscellaneous/esperanto-nouns.lexc
LEXICON Root
        Nouns;

LEXICON Nouns
bird    Nmf;
hund    Nmf;
kat     Nmf;
elefant Nmf;

LEXICON Nmf
in      Nmf;
et      Nmf;
eg      Nmf;
        Nend;

LEXICON Nend
o       Number;

LEXICON Number
j       Case ;
        Case ;

LEXICON Case
n       # ;
        # ;
